Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB893.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 532.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When multiple sentences of imprisonment are imposed on a defendant for more
than one (1) crime, including a crime for which a previous sentence of probation or
conditional discharge has been revoked, the multiple sentences shall run
concurrently or consecutively as the court shall determine at the time of sentence,
except that:
(a) A definite and an indeterminate term shall run concurrently and both
sentences shall be satisfied by service of the indeterminate term;
(b) The aggregate of consecutive definite terms shall not exceed one (1) year; and
(c) [1. Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the aggregate of
consecutive indeterminate terms shall not exceed in maximum length
the longest extended term which would be authorized by KRS 532.080
for the highest class of crime for which any of the sentences is imposed,
except as described in KRS 533.060(2) or (3).
2. In no event shall the aggregate of consecutive indeterminate terms
exceed seventy (70) years; and
(d) ]The sentences of a defendant convicted of two (2) or more felony sex crimes,
as defined in KRS 17.500, involving two (2) or more victims shall run
consecutively.
(2) If the court does not specify the manner in which a sentence imposed by it is to run,
the sentence shall run concurrently with any other sentence which the defendant
must serve unless the sentence is required by subsection (3) of this section or KRS
533.060 to run consecutively.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, if a person is
convicted of an offense that is committed while he or she is imprisoned in a penal
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2520
or reformatory institution, during an escape from imprisonment, or while he or she
awaits imprisonment, the sentence imposed for that offense may be added to the
portion of the term which remained unserved at the time of the commission of the
offense. The sentence imposed upon any person convicted of an escape or
attempted escape offense shall run consecutively with any other sentence which the
defendant must serve.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, if a person is
convicted of an offense that is committed while he or she is imprisoned in a penal
or reformatory institution, the sentence imposed for that offense may, upon order of
the trial court, be served in that institution. The person may be transferred to
another institution pursuant to administrative regulations of the Department of
Corrections.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:53 PM Jacketed